Washington statutes.
RCW 15.53.9022

Misbranding—Definition—Unlawful to distribute.

It shall be unlawful for any person to distribute misbranded feed. A commercial feed shall be deemed to be misbranded:

(1) If its labeling is false or misleading in any particular;

(2) If it is distributed under the name of another commercial feed;

(3) If it is not labeled as required in RCW 15.53.9016 and in rules prescribed under this chapter;

(4) If it purports to be or is represented as a commercial feed, or if it purports to contain or is represented as containing a commercial feed or feed ingredient, unless such commercial feed or feed ingredient conforms to the definition of identity, if any, prescribed by rule of the department. In the adopting of such rules the department may consider commonly accepted definitions such as those issued by nationally recognized associations or groups of feed control officials;

(5) If any word, statement, or other information required by or under authority of this chapter to appear on the label or labeling is not prominently placed thereon with such conspicuousness (as compared with other words, statements, designs, or devices, in the labeling) and in such terms as to render it likely to be read and understood by the ordinary individual under customary conditions of purchase and use;

(6) If its composition or quality falls below or differs from that which it is purported or is represented to possess by its labeling.

[ 1995 c 374 s 40; 1965 ex.s. c 31 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 c 374 ss 1-47, 50-53, and 59-68: See note following RCW 15.36.012.